Utah statutes.
53A-24-403.   Appointment of administrator for the division.

(1)  The executive director shall appoint an administrator for DSDHH with the approval of the board.

(2)  The administrator of DSDHH shall administer the division in accordance with the direction of the executive director, board policies, and applicable state and federal laws and regulations.

